Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB68.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the State-Owned Vehicle Assignment Limitation Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"State official." A member of the General Assembly."State-owned vehicle." A vehicle that is owned by the Commonwealth.Section 3. Limitations on State-owned vehicle leases.(a) General rule.--Except as provided under subsection (b):(1) A State official may not be assigned a State-owned 12345678910111213141516 vehicle.(2) Commonwealth funds may not be used to lease a vehicle to or on behalf of a State official.(b) Emergency response.--This section shall not apply to a State official whose official duties require the assignment or lease of a vehicle for emergency response.Section 4. Continued use of vehicles.(a) Continued use.--A State official who has been assigned a State-owned vehicle or a vehicle leased by the Commonwealth before the effective date of this subsection may continue to use the vehicle under the same rules and procedures in effect before the effective date of this subsection until the State official is no longer a member of the General Assembly, relinquishes control of the vehicle back to the Commonwealth or is otherwise no longer eligible to use the vehicle under the rules and procedures in effect before the effective date of this subsection.(b) Prohibition.--A State official who has been assigned a State-owned vehicle or a vehicle leased by the Commonwealth before the effective date of this subsection may not be assigned a different State-owned vehicle or a vehicle leased by the Commonwealth after the State official ceases using the assigned vehicle.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0068PN0056 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425